Vermont, session 2025-2026, H17.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER ADOPTION APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the adoption of the charter of the Town of
Morristown as set forth in this act. The voters of the Town approved the
proposal of adoption on November 5, 2024.
Sec. 2. REDESIGNATION
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 129C (Town of Northfield) is redesignated to
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 129D.
Sec. 3. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 129C is added to read:
CHAPTER 129C. TOWN OF MORRISTOWN
§ 1. CORPORATE EXISTENCE RETAINED
The inhabitants of the Town of Morristown, within the corporate limits now
established, shall continue to be a municipal corporation by the name of the
Town of Morristown.
§ 2. GENERAL LAW; APPLICATION
Except when changed or modified by this charter, or by any lawful
regulation or ordinance of the Town, all of the statutes of the State relating to
municipalities shall apply to the Town.
VT LEG #383390 v.1

No. M-2 Page 2 of 2
2025
§ 3. TOWN MANAGER
(a) The Town Manager shall be the chief executive officer and the head of
the administrative branch of the Town government and shall be responsible to
the Selectboard for the efficient administration of the municipal affairs of the
Town.
(b) The Town Manager shall have the authority to hire, appoint, discipline,
and remove all Town employees, subject to the provisions of personnel rules
approved by the Selectboard. The Town Manager may authorize a department
head to hire, appoint, discipline, or remove an employee, subject to the
Manager’s discretion and supervision.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 5, 2025
VT LEG #383390 v.1